Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1212.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "awaiting testing" in section 2 of the act of November 29, 2006 (P.L.1471, No.165), known as the Sexual Assault Testing and Evidence Collection Act, is amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Awaiting testing." [With respect to sexual assault evidence,] Sexual assault evidence that [meets all of the following:12345678910111213141516171819 (1) Has been collected and is in the possession of a local law enforcement agency.(2) Has not received DNA and other appropriate forensic analyses.(3) Is related to a criminal case or investigation in which final disposition has not been reached.(4) Should undergo DNA or other appropriate forensic analysis as determined by a local law enforcement agency.] has been collected and has not received DNA and other appropriate forensic analyses.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1212PN1499 - 2 - 123456789101112